Utah statutes.
26-49-301.   Relation to other laws.

(1) (a)  This chapter does not limit rights, privileges, or immunities provided to volunteer health practitioners by laws other than this chapter.

(b)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), this chapter does not affect requirements for the use of health practitioners pursuant to Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 4, Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

(2)  An authorized representative of a party state may incorporate volunteer health practitioners into the emergency forces of Utah even if those volunteer health practitioners are not officers or employees of Utah, a political subdivision of Utah, or a municipality or other local government within Utah.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 2008 General Session

